Utah statutes.
73-2-4.   Deputy and assistants -- Employment and salaries -- Purchase of equipment and supplies.

For the purpose of performing the duties of his office the state engineer may:

(1)  employ a deputy and all necessary assistants;

(2)  fix division employees' salaries in accordance with salary standards adopted by the Division of Finance; and

(3)  purchase all necessary equipment and supplies.

